Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Article 2. Wyoming Digest

Cross references. —

As to publication of decisions of supreme court, see §§

5-2-401

to 5-2-403.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d Copyright and Literary Property §§ 58, 66.

§§ 8-2-201 and 8-2-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 16, § 2, related to the distribution and sale of digests by the secretary of state, and the purchase and distribution of digest supplements, respectively.